District of Columbia statutes.
50-1103

Appropriations for inspection facilities.

The annual estimates of appropriations for the government of the District of Columbia for the fiscal year 1939 and succeeding fiscal years shall include estimates of appropriations for the construction and/or rental and/or leasing of ground and buildings, the purchase of equipment and supplies, and the payment of salaries of mechanics, laborers, clerks, and other employees to carry out the annual inspection of all motor vehicles and trailers in the District of Columbia.

History

Feb. 18, 1938, 52 Stat. 78, ch. 31, § 3
July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 360, ch. 258, Art. IV, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-203.
1973 Ed., § 40-203.